Tennessee, session 114, HB2120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-69-109(c), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
Each authority shall also file the annual report of its business affairs and
transactions with the department of tourist development.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2120
011972
- 1 -